Maryland, session 2026, HB1384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1384*

HOUSE BILL 1384
Article – Health – General
15–103.
(a) (1) The Secretary shall administer the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program.
(G) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 15–1601 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
(III) “SPREAD PRICING” MEANS THE MODEL OF PRESCRIPTION
DRUG PRICING IN WHICH THE PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER CHARGES THE
PROGRAM OR A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION A CONTRACTED PRICE FOR A
PRESCRIPTION DRUG THAT DIFFERS FROM THE AMOUNT THE PHARMACY BENEFITS
MANAGER DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY PAYS THE PHARMACIST OR PHARMACY FOR
THE PRESCRIPTION DRUG DISPENSED BY THE PHARMACIST OR PHARMACY.
(IV) “STATE PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER” MEANS THE
PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER CONTRACTED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS
SECTION TO ADMINISTER PHARMACY BENEFITS FOR ALL PROGRAM RECIPIENTS IN
THE STATE, INCLUDING THOSE ENROLLED IN A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION.
(2) (I) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
SELECT AND CONTRACT WITH A SINGLE THIRD–PARTY ADMINISTRATOR TO SERVE
AS THE STATE PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER.
(II) EACH MANAGED CARE CONTRACT THAT IS ENTERED INTO
OR RENEWED BY THE DEPARTMENT ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2028, SHALL REQUIRE
THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION TO CONTRACT WITH AND USE THE STATE
PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER FOR THE PURPOSE OF ADMINISTERING ALL
PHARMACY BENEFITS FOR PROGRAM RECIPIENTS ENROLLED WITH THE MANAGED
CARE ORGANIZATION.
(3) THE CONTRACT ENTERED INTO UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(I) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL:
(I) ESTABLISH THE STATE PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER’S
FIDUCIARY DUTY OWED TO THE DEPARTMENT;
(II) REQUIRE THE USE OF PASS–THROUGH PRICING;

HOUSE BILL 1384 3
(III) REQUIRE THE STATE PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER TO
USE THE COMMON FORMULARY, REIMBURSEMENT METHODOLOGIES, AND
DISPENSING FEES NEGOTIATED BY THE DEPARTMENT WITH INPUT FROM
STAKEHOLDERS;
(IV) REQUIRE TRANSPARENCY IN DRUG COSTS, REBATES
COLLECTED AND PAID, DISPENSING FEES PAID, ADMINISTRATIVE FEES, AND ALL
OTHER CHARGES, FEES, COSTS, AND HOLDBACKS; AND
(V) PROHIBIT SPREAD PRICING.
(4) (I) TO ADVISE THE DEPARTMENT IN SELECTING AND
CONTRACTING WITH THE SINGLE THIRD–PARTY ADMINISTRATOR UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ENGAGE AN
INDEPENDENT CONSULTANT WITH DIRECT EXPERIENCE:
1. ADVISING MEDICAID FRAUD CONTROL UNITS; AND
2. WORKING WITH STATES THAT HAVE ESTABLISHED A
SINGLE PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER FOR THEIR MEDICAID PROGRAM.
(II) THE INDEPENDENT CONSULTANT ENGAGED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT BE ENGAGED BY A MANAGED
CARE ORGANIZATION OR BY ANY PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER CONTRACTED
WITH A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION.
Article – Insurance
15–1601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(p) (1) “Pharmacy benefits management services” means:
(i) the procurement of prescription drugs at a negotiated rate for
dispensation within the State to beneficiaries;
(ii) the administration or management of prescription drug coverage
provided by a purchaser for beneficiaries; and
(iii) any of the following services provided with regard to the
administration of prescription drug coverage:
1. mail service pharmacy;

HOUSE BILL 1384
2. claims processing, retail network management, and
payment of claims to pharmacies for prescription drugs dispensed to beneficiaries;
3. clinical formulary development and management services;
4. rebate contracting and administration;
5. patient compliance, therapeutic intervention, and generic
substitution programs; or
6. disease management programs.
(2) “Pharmacy benefits management services” does not include any service
provided by a nonprofit health maintenance organization that operates as a group model,
provided that the service:
(i) is provided solely to a member of the nonprofit health
maintenance organization; and
(ii) is furnished through the internal pharmacy operations of the
nonprofit health maintenance organization.
(q) “Pharmacy benefits manager” means a person that performs pharmacy
benefits management services.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.